Utah statutes.
4-17-8.5.   Hearing before county weed control board -- Appeal of decision to the county legislative body -- Judicial review.

(1)  Any person served with notice to control noxious weeds may request a hearing to appeal the terms of the notice before the county weed control board within 10 days of receipt of such notice and may appeal the decision of the county weed control board to the county legislative body.

(2)  Any person served with notice to control noxious weeds who has had a hearing before both the county weed control board and the  county legislative body may further appeal the decision of the county legislative body by filing written notice of appeal with a court of competent jurisdiction.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

